Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.215

Powers relative to systems of sewerage.

A metropolitan municipal corporation authorized to perform water pollution abatement may exercise all the powers relating to systems of sewerage authorized by RCW 36.94.010, 36.94.020, and 36.94.140 for counties.

[ 1997 c 447 s 13.]

NOTES:

Finding—Purpose—1997 c 447: See note following RCW 70.05.074.